North Carolina, session 2025, SB1007.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

HUMAN TRAFFICKING REPORTING AND RESPONSE SYSTEM
SECTION 1.(a) This section shall be known as "The Human Trafficking
Identification and Reporting Act."
SECTION 1.(b) The General Assembly finds all of the following:
(1) Human trafficking is a pervasive crime that often goes undetected. National
statistics indicate that hundreds of thousands of people are trafficked in the
United States each year, yet the vast majority are never identified. Existing
reporting systems, including the National Human Trafficking Hotline, are
critical but rely primarily on phone calls or text messages, which many
witnesses or victims are unable or unwilling to make.
(2) Frontline professionals — law enforcement officers, healthcare providers,
teachers and social workers — often lack a unified, secure, trauma-informed
system to document and triage suspected trafficking. Current approaches are
fragmented and underutilized, resulting in missed opportunities to protect
victims and prosecute.
(3) Advances in technology now permit the development of secure, multilingual
platforms that allow anonymous reporting, AI-assisted triage, and real-time
routing of tips to appropriate authorities. Such platforms can empower both
the public and professionals to identify suspected trafficking and connect
survivors with support.
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 7A-354(c) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
*S1007-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"(8) To develop and implement a human trafficking reporting and response system
in accordance with G.S. 7A-354.2."
SECTION 1.(d) Article 29 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 7A-354.2. Reports of human trafficking.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Human trafficking. – Modern-day slavery that includes extreme exploitation
and the denial of freedom or liberty of an individual for purposes of deriving
benefit from that individual's commercial sex act or labor. This term includes
all of the offenses set forth in G.S. 14-43.11 through G.S. 14-43.14.
(2) Mandated reporter. – Any individual who is required by law to report
suspected abuse, exploitation, or human trafficking of a minor or vulnerable
person, including a teacher, health care professional, law enforcement
personnel, and social worker.
(b) Development & Implementation. – The North Carolina Human Resources
Commission (Commission), in consultation with the Department of Information Technology,
shall contract with a vendor to develop and implement a human trafficking reporting and response
system. The system required under this subsection shall do all of the following:
(1) Provide multichannel access for the public and professionals, including
mobile applications, web portals, short messaging services, and voice or live
chats.
(2) Guide users through structured questions to identify indicators of human
trafficking and enables users to upload supporting evidence.
(3) Allow reporters to remain anonymous and exercises consent-based controls
over personally identifiable information.
(4) Utilize an artificial intelligence assisted risk model or similar decision support
system to triage reports based on severity and credibility and push
notifications to authorized investigative agencies.
(5) Route high priority reports in real time to the appropriate law enforcement
agency, child protection agency, or vetted service provider based on
jurisdiction.
(6) Provide secure dashboards for authorized agencies to view, manage, and
respond to reports with role-based access controls and audit logging.
(7) Is interoperable with the National Human Trafficking Hotline, State child
welfare systems, law enforcement case management systems, and other
relevant platforms through standardized application programming interfaces.
(8) Comply with all applicable federal and State privacy laws, including the
Health Information Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and the
Criminal Justice Information Services security policy.
(c) Utilization of System. – Mandated reporters may utilize the system developed under
subsection (b) of this section as the primary mechanism for reporting suspected human
trafficking. The platform shall facilitate referral to the National Human Trafficking Hotline for
crisis support as necessary. The provisions of this subsection do not preclude a mandated reporter
from utilizing the National Human Trafficking Hotline or other reporting channels.
(d) Notifications. – The system developed under subsection (b) of this section shall send
notifications of high priority reports to designated law enforcement and child protection officials
and shall provide a secure dashboard for authorized personnel to view, triage, and respond to
reports. The system shall support real-time communication between investigators and survivors
or reporters with consent.
(e) Data Privacy. – The system developed under subsection (b) of this section shall
employ encryption in transit and at rest, role-based access controls, audit logging, and
Page 2 Senate Bill 1007-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
consent-based data sharing. Individuals reporting to the system may do so anonymously. Except
as otherwise required by law, personal data of the individual providing a report to the system
shall not be shared with law enforcement or other agencies without the individual's consent. The
system shall not permit downloading, printing, or copying of data outside the system. All user
actions shall be logged and subject to audit. Except where State or federal law require otherwise,
data collected through the system shall be retained for no more than five years from the date the
data was collected.
(f) Funds. – Notwithstanding other provisions of law, the Commission is authorized to
spend any federal, State, local, or private funds available for this purpose to administer the
provisions of this section.
(g) Reporting. – The Commission shall submit a quarterly report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety that includes all of the following information
for the quarter immediately preceding the report:
(1) The number of reports submitted to the system developed under subsection
(b) of this section and their classification by risk level.
(2) The number of reports routed to law enforcement and other agencies.
(3) The time from submission to the system to action by the investigating agency.
(4) The number of human trafficking survivors connected to services.
(5) Any outreach activities completed.
(6) Any operational issues, privacy incidents, or system enhancements.
(h) Biennial Evaluation. – No later than two years from the date the system developed
under subsection (b) of this section is operational, and every two years thereafter, the
Commission shall commission an independent evaluation of the system's impact on victim
identification, prosecution outcomes, and service delivery. The Commission shall make
evaluations completed under this subsection available to the public."
SECTION 1.(e) The North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission shall develop
and implement a public awareness campaign to inform the public and relevant professionals of
the availability of the reporting system required under G.S. 7A-354.2, as enacted by subsection
(d) of this section.
SECTION 1.(f) The first quarterly report under G.S. 7A-354.2(g), as enacted by
subsection (d) of this section, shall be submitted by no later than March 1, 2027.
SECTION 1.(g) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Administrative
Office of the Courts, North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission, the sum of (i) two hundred
thousand dollars ($200,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and (ii) one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2027-2028 fiscal year, to be
used for costs incurred by the Commission from implementing the provisions of G.S. 7A-354.2,
as enacted by subsection (d) of this section, and to provide grants to the vendor for costs incurred
by the vendor from implementing the provisions of G.S. 7A-354.2, as enacted by subsection (d)
of this section.
SECTION 1.(h) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

EXCISE TAX ON PRUIENT MATERIALS
SECTION 2.(a) Subchapter I of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new Article to read:
"Article 2F.
"Harmful Materials Tax.
"§ 105-113.135. Definitions.
The definitions of G.S. 14-190.13 and the following definitions apply to this Article:
(1) Harmful materials vendor. – A retailer that offers for sale material that is
harmful to minors at a physical retail location in the State.
Senate Bill 1007-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Harmful to minors. – That quality of any material or performance that depicts
sexually explicit nudity or sexual activity and that, taken as a whole, has the
following characteristics:
a. The average adult person applying contemporary community
standards would find that the material or performance has a
predominant tendency to appeal to a prurient interest of minors in sex;
and
b. The average adult person applying contemporary community
standards would find that the depiction of sexually explicit nudity or
sexual activity in the material or performance is patently offensive to
prevailing standards in the adult community concerning what is
suitable for minors; and
c. The material or performance lacks serious literary, artistic, political,
or scientific value for minors.
(3) Material. – Pictures, drawings, video recordings, films or other visual or
physical depictions or representations, including digital or
computer-generated visual depictions or representations created, adapted, or
modified by technological means, such as algorithms or artificial intelligence,
but not material consisting entirely of written words.
(4) Retailer. – As defined in G.S. 105-164.3.
(5) Secretary. – The Secretary of Revenue.
"§ 105-113.136. Tax on harmful materials vendors.
(a) Tax. – A tax at the rate of ten percent (10%) is imposed on each harmful materials
vendor. The tax applies to the gross receipts attributable to the sale of material harmful to minors
by the harmful materials vendor at a physical retail location in the State.
(b) Return. – Taxes levied by this Article are due when a return is required to be filed. A
return is required to be filed on a quarterly basis and is due no later than the twentieth day of the
month following the calendar quarter covered by the return. The return shall be filed on a form
prescribed by the Secretary.
(c) Records. – A person who is required to file a return under this Article must keep a
record of all documents used to determine information the person provides in a return. These
records shall be open at all times for inspection by the Secretary or an authorized representative
of the Secretary and shall be kept for the applicable period of statute of limitations as set forth
under Article 9 of this Chapter.
"§ 105-113.137. Registration requirement.
A harmful materials vendor must register with the Secretary on a form required by the
Secretary and include all information requested.
"§ 105-113.138. Use of tax proceeds.
The Secretary shall credit the net proceeds of the tax collected under this Article as follows:
(1) Fifty percent (50%) to the Administrative Office of the Courts to be allocated
to the North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission established under
G.S. 7A-354.
(2) The remainder to the Domestic Violence Center Fund established in
G.S. 50B-9."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2026.

TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 143-805(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to an official or employee that
is engaged in any of the following activities in the course of that official's or employee's official
duties:
Page 4 Senate Bill 1007-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…
(8) Investigating matters involving offenders incarcerated with, or otherwise
under the supervision of, the Department of Adult Correction or matters
related to the misuse of devices owned by the Department of Adult
Correction."
SECTION 3.(b) G.S. 42A-39 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(c1) Third-Party Contractor Requirements. – A third-party contractor shall ensure that any
employee of the third-party contractor who performs housekeeping services at the vacation rental
or provides check-in and check-out services for the vacation rental receive human trafficking
awareness training as required by subsection (c) of this section."
SECTION 3.(c) G.S. 130A-511(b)(1) reads as rewritten:
"(1) In consultation with the North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission, the
North Carolina Restaurant and Lodging Association, and the Department of
Health and Human Services, develop a training course, or identify existing
training courses, to inform and educate individuals about human trafficking.
Chapter 150B of the General Statutes does not apply to any training required
to be developed or identified under this subdivision."
SECTION 3.(d) Subsection (a) of this section is effective when it becomes law and
applies to investigations occurring before, on, or after that date. Subsection (b) of this section is
effective when it becomes law and applies to training required to be completed on or after that
date. Subsection (c) of this section is effective when it becomes law and applies to training
developed or identified before, on, or after that date.

APPROPRIATION
SECTION 4.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Safety the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2026-2027 fiscal year and the sum of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2027-2028 fiscal year to allocate to the Cleveland County Sheriff's
Office to be used to support the establishment of a counter trafficking task force by the Sheriff's
Office to combat the growing number of incidents involving human trafficking, child sexual
assault, and child sexual exploitation.
SECTION 4.(b) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided in this act, this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Senate Bill 1007-First Edition Page 5